California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
 penalties imposed by subdivisions (d), (e), and (f) shall be limited to a maximum of 10 percent of the taxes due, exclusive of prepayments, for any one return. Any person remitting taxes by electronic funds transfer shall be subject to the penalties under this section and not Section 7655.

(i) The penalties imposed with respect to paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) and Sections 7659.5 and 7659.6 shall be limited to a maximum of 6 percent of the prepayment amount.

(j) The board shall promulgate regulations pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code for purposes of implementing this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 519, Sec. 2.   Effective October 4, 2005.   Operative January 1, 2006, by Sec. 25 of Ch. 519.)
-------------------------------------------

7659.91.

If the board finds that a person’s failure to make payment by an appropriate electronic funds transfer in accordance with board procedures is due to reasonable cause and circumstances beyond the person’s control, and occurred notwithstanding the exercise of ordinary care and in the absence of willful neglect, that person shall be relieved of the penalty provided in subdivision (e) of Section 7659.9. Any person seeking to be relieved of the penalty shall file with the board a statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts upon which he or she
 bases his or her claim for relief.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 251, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

7659.92.

(a) “Electronic funds transfer” means any transfer of funds, other than a transaction originated by check, draft, or similar paper instrument, that is initiated through an electronic terminal, telephonic instrument, or computer or magnetic tape, so as to order, instruct, or authorize a financial institution to debit or credit an account. Electronic funds transfers shall be accomplished by an automated clearinghouse debit, an automated clearinghouse credit, or by Federal Reserve Wire Transfer (Fedwire).

(b) “Automated clearinghouse” means any federal reserve bank, or an organization established in agreement with the National Automated Clearing House Association, that operates as a clearinghouse for transmitting or receiving entries between banks or bank accounts and which authorizes an electronic transfer of funds between these banks or bank accounts.

(c) “Automated clearinghouse debit” means a transaction in which the state, through its designated depository bank, originates an automated clearinghouse transaction debiting the person’s bank account and crediting the state’s bank account for the amount of tax. Banking costs incurred for the automated clearinghouse debit transaction shall be paid by the state.

(d) “Automated clearinghouse credit” means an automated clearinghouse transaction in which the person, through
 his or her own bank, originates an entry crediting the state’s bank account and debiting his or her own bank account. Banking costs incurred for the automated clearinghouse credit transaction charged to the state shall be paid by the person originating the credit.

(e) “Fedwire transfer” means any transaction originated by a person and utilizing the national electronic payment system to transfer funds through the federal reserve banks, when that person debits his or her own bank account and credits the state’s bank account. Electronic funds transfers pursuant to Section 7659.9 may be made by Fedwire only if payment cannot, for good cause, be made according to subdivision (a), and the use of Fedwire is preapproved by the board. Banking costs incurred for the Fedwire transaction charged to the person and to the state shall be paid by the person originating the transaction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 251, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

7659.93.

(a) Any return, report, declaration statement, or other document required to be made under this part that is filed using electronic media shall be filed and authenticated pursuant to any method or form the board may prescribe.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, any return, report, declaration, statement, or other document otherwise required to be signed that is filed by
 the taxpayer using electronic media in a form as required by the board shall be deemed to be a signed, valid original document, including upon reproduction to paper form by the board.

(c) Electronic media includes, but is not limited to, computer modem, magnetic media, optical disk, facsimile machine, or telephone.

(d) Upon written approval of the board, a person may satisfy the requirements of subdivision (a) by executing and providing to the board a consent and authorization for the Internal Revenue Service to provide to the board under Section 6103 of the Internal Revenue Code, the return filed by the person under Section 48.4101-2 of Title 26 of the Code of Federal Regulations. The board, in its sole discretion, may rescind its approval and require a person to file reports as specified in subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 429, Sec. 33.   Effective October 2, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 78 of Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Determination if No Return Made [7660. - 7663.]

7660.

If any supplier fails, neglects, or refuses to file the return within the time prescribed by this chapter, the board shall estimate the motor vehicle fuel removals, entries or sales for the period for which he or she made no return within the time required. Upon the basis of this estimate the board shall determine the tax due from the supplier, and shall add to the tax a penalty of 10 percent thereof. The board may make a determination for more than one period and may make one or more determinations for the same
 period.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7661.

All determinations so made, exclusive of penalties, shall bear interest at the modified adjusted rate per month, or fraction thereof, established pursuant to Section 6591.5, from the last day of the month after the close of the monthly period for which the amount or any portion thereof should have been returned until the date of payment.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7662.

If the neglect or refusal of a supplier to file a return is due to fraud or intent to evade the tax, a penalty of 25 percent of the tax shall be added thereto in addition to the 10 percent penalty provided in Section 7660.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7663.

Promptly after making its determination the board shall give to the delinquent supplier written notice of the estimate, tax, and penalty, the notice shall be given in the manner prescribed in Section 7671 for giving notice of a deficiency determination.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Deficiency Determinations [7670. - 7676.]

7670.

If the board is not satisfied with the return made by any supplier, it may make a deficiency determination of the tax required to be paid by the supplier based upon information contained in the return or upon any information in the possession of the board. The board may make a determination for more than one period and may make one or more determinations for the same period. When a business is discontinued a determination may be made at any time thereafter, within the period specified in Section 7675, as to liability arising out of
 that business, irrespective of whether the determination is issued prior to the due date of the liability as otherwise specified in this part.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7671.

The department shall give the supplier written notice of its determination. The notice shall be served in one of the following manners:

(a) By placing the notice in a sealed envelope, with postage paid, addressed to the supplier at the supplier’s address as it appears in the records of the department. Service made pursuant to this subdivision shall be deemed complete at the time of the deposit of the notice in the United States Post Office, or a mailbox, sub-post office, substation, or mail chute, or other facility maintained or provided by the United States Postal Service, without extension of time for any reason.

(b) By personally delivering the notice to the person to be served.
 Service made pursuant to this subdivision shall be deemed complete at the time of that delivery. Personal service to a corporation may be made by delivery of a notice to any person designated in the Code of Civil Procedure to be served for the corporation with summons and complaint in a civil action.

(c) (1) By delivering the notice electronically via secure transmission when either of the following applies:

(A) The taxpayer requests the notice of determination to be sent electronically via secure transmission.

(B) The department has evidence that the taxpayer no longer receives mail at the address of record and has previously provided an address for electronic mail.

(2) Service provided pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be deemed
 complete at the time the department electronically transmits the notice via the taxpayer’s secure web portal, without extension of time for any reason.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 17.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

7672.

If any part of the deficiency for which a deficiency determination is made is due to neglect or intentional disregard of this part or authorized rules and regulations, a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of the determination shall be added thereto.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7673.

If any part of the deficiency for which a deficiency determination is made is due to fraud or an intent to evade the tax, a penalty of 25 percent of the amount of the determination shall be added thereto.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7674.

All deficiency determinations, exclusive of penalty, shall bear interest at the modified adjusted rate per month, or fraction thereof, established pursuant to Section 6591.5, from the last day of the month following the close of the monthly period for which the amount or any portion thereof should have been returned until the date of payment.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7675.

Except in the case of fraud, intent to evade this part or authorized rules and regulations, or failure to make a return, every notice of a deficiency determination shall be given to the supplier within three years after the last day of the month following the monthly period for which the amount is proposed to be determined or within three years after the return is filed, whichever period expires the later. In the case of a failure to make a return the notice of determination shall be served within eight years after the date the return was due.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 18.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

7675.1.

In the case of a deficiency arising under this part during the lifetime of a decedent, a notice of deficiency determination shall be served within four months after written request therefor, in the form required by the department, by the fiduciary of the estate or trust or by any other person liable for the tax or any portion thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 19.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

7676.

If, before the expiration of the time prescribed in Section 7675 for serving a notice of deficiency determination, the taxpayer has consented in writing to service of the notice after that time, the notice may be served at any time prior to the expiration of the period agreed upon. The period so agreed upon may be extended by subsequent agreements in writing made before the expiration of the period previously agreed upon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 20.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Jeopardy Determinations and Weekly Payments [7698. - 7707.]

7698.

If the board believes that the collection of any amount of tax imposed under this part will be jeopardized by delay, it shall thereupon make a determination of the amount of tax, noting that fact upon the determination. The amount determined is immediately due and payable.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7699.

If the amount of the tax, interest, and penalty specified in the jeopardy determination is not paid within 10 days after service upon the supplier of notice of the determination, the determination becomes final, unless a petition for redetermination is filed within the 10 days, and the delinquency penalty and interest provided in Article 6 (commencing with Section 7710) shall attach to the amount specified.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7700.

The supplier against whom a jeopardy determination is made may petition for the redetermination thereof pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 7710). He or she shall, however, file the petition for redetermination with the board within 10 days after the service upon him or her of notice of the determination. At the time of filing the petition for redetermination, the supplier shall deposit with the board such security as it may deem necessary to ensure compliance with this part.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7700.5.

In accordance with these rules and regulations as the board may prescribe, the person against whom a jeopardy determination is made may apply for an administrative hearing for one or more of the following purposes:

(a) To establish that the determination is excessive.

(b) To establish that the sale of property that may be seized after issuance of the jeopardy determination or any part thereof shall be
 delayed pending the administrative hearing because the sale would result in irreparable injury to the person.

(c) To request the release of all or a part of the property to the person.

(d) To request a stay of collection activities. The application shall be filed within 30 days after service of the notice of jeopardy determination and shall be in writing and state the specific factual and legal grounds upon which it is founded. No security need be posted to file the application and to obtain this hearing. However, if the person does not deposit within the 10-day period prescribed in Section 7700, such security as the board may deem necessary to ensure compliance with this part, the filing of the application shall not operate as a stay of collection activities, except sale of property seized after issuance of the jeopardy determination. Upon a showing of good cause for failure to
 file a timely application for administrative hearing, the board may allow a filing of the application and grant the person an administrative hearing. The filing of an application pursuant to this section shall not affect provisions of Section 7699 relating to the finality date of the determination or to penalty or interest.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7701.

If the board deems the procedure necessary in order to insure payment to the state of the amount of taxes due from any supplier under this part, it may require the supplier to make returns and payments of taxes on a weekly basis. The supplier must then file a return each Tuesday showing the total number of gallons of motor vehicle fuel removed, entered, or sold by the supplier during the week ending the Saturday next preceding, the amount of tax due for that week and such other information as the board deems necessary for the proper
 administration of this article. The return shall be accompanied by a remittance payable to the Controller for the amount of tax due for the period covered.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7702.

A supplier required to make weekly payments is not relieved of the duty of filing the verified monthly return required by Article 1 (commencing with Section 7651).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7703.

Whenever any supplier who is required to pay tax in weekly installments as provided by Section 7701 fails to make a weekly return or to pay the full amount in accordance with the terms and conditions prescribed by the board, the supplier’s license may be revoked forthwith.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7704.

If a supplier fails to make the supplier’s weekly return or to pay any weekly installment of the tax, or any part thereof, pursuant to the requirement imposed upon the supplier under Section 7701, the full amount of the installment becomes immediately due and payable. The board shall thereupon make a jeopardy determination under Section 7698 and the Controller and the Attorney General shall forthwith collect the tax due from the supplier in the manner prescribed by Chapters 5 (commencing with Section 7651) and 6 (commencing with
 Section 7851). All provisions of those chapters, where relevant, apply to collections required to be made under this article.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7705.

If any supplier fails to pay any weekly installment of tax shown to be due by the supplier’s return on the Tuesday when required to be paid, a penalty of 5 percent shall be added thereto. In addition, if any weekly installment of tax remains unpaid on the last day of the month following the month during which the last of the removals, entries for sales occurred on which the weekly installment was levied, a penalty of 10 percent of the installment, exclusive of penalties, shall be added thereto.

The weekly installment shall be deemed not paid or unpaid on any particular day:

(a) If not paid prior to 5 p.m. of that day, when paid in person.

(b) If the envelope in which the remittance is enclosed bears a post office cancellation mark dated later than that day, when paid by mail.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7706.

All jeopardy determinations including those made under Section 7704, exclusive of penalty, shall bear interest at the modified adjusted rate per month, or fraction thereof, established pursuant to Section 6591.5, from the last day of the month following the close of the monthly period for which the amount or any portion thereof should have been returned until the date of payment.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7707.

Any notice required by this article shall be given in the manner prescribed in Section 7671 for giving notice of a deficiency determination.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Redeterminations [7710. - 7716.]

7710.

Any supplier against whom a determination is made by the board under Article 3 (commencing with Section 7660) and Article 4 (commencing with Section 7670) may petition for a redetermination within 30 days after the date the notice thereof is given to him. If a petition for redetermination is not filed within the 30-day period, the determination becomes final at the expiration of the period.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7710.5.

Every petition for redetermination shall be in writing and shall state the specific grounds upon which the petition is founded. The petition may be amended to state additional grounds at any time prior to the date on which the board issues its order or decision upon the petition for the redetermination.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7711.

If a petition for redetermination is filed within the 30-day period, the board shall reconsider the determination and, if the supplier has so requested in his or her petition shall grant him or her an oral hearing and shall give him or her 10 days notice of the time and place of the hearing. Service of notice shall be as prescribed by Section 7671. The board may continue the hearing from time to time as may be necessary.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7711.5.

The board may decrease or increase the amount of the determination before it becomes final, but the amount may be increased only if a claim for the increase is asserted by the board at or before the hearing. Unless the penalty imposed by Section 7662, Section 7673, or Section 7726 applies to the amount of the determination as originally made or as increased, the claim for increase must be asserted within eight years after the date the return for the period for which the increase is asserted was due.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7712.

The order or decision of the board upon a petition for redetermination becomes final 30 days after the giving of notice thereof to the supplier as prescribed by Section 7671.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7713.

All determinations made by the board under this chapter are due and payable at the time they become final. If they are not paid when due and payable, a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of the determination, exclusive of interest and penalties, shall be added thereto. Payments shall be made in the form of a remittance payable to the Controller and shall be filed with the board together with a copy of the notice of determination which the board shall furnish to the supplier for that purpose.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7714.

In making a determination the board may offset overpayments for a period or periods, together with interest on the overpayments, against underpayments for another period or periods, against penalties, and against the interest on the underpayments. The interest on the underpayments and overpayments shall be computed in the manner set forth in Sections 7674 and 8130.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7715.

All payments received by the board from suppliers under this part shall be deposited by the board for the Controller in the State Treasury and appropriate advices of those payments shall be transmitted to the Controller by the board.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7716.

The board shall notify the Controller of any and all determinations made pursuant to this chapter as well as the amounts self-determined under this part, and the Controller shall keep an appropriate record of all such matters.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Payments by Unlicensed Persons [7726. - 7732.]

7726.

(a) If any person becomes a supplier without first securing a license, the tax, applicable penalties and interest, if any, become immediately due and payable on account of all motor vehicle fuel removed, sold, or entered by the supplier.

(b) The board shall forthwith ascertain as best it may the amount of motor vehicle fuel removed, sold, or entered and shall determine immediately the tax on the amount, adding to the tax a penalty of 25 percent of
 the amount of the tax, and shall give the unlicensed supplier notice of this determination as prescribed by Section 7671; provided, however, that where the board determines that failure to secure a license was due to reasonable cause, the penalty may be waived. The provisions of Sections 7699 and 7700 shall be applicable with respect to the finality of the determination and the right of the unlicensed supplier to petition for a redetermination.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7727.

(a) The backup tax imposed under Section 7364 and any applicable penalties and interest shall be immediately due and payable. The board shall forthwith ascertain as best it may the amount of motor vehicle fuel sold, or delivered into the fuel tank of a motor vehicle fuel-powered highway vehicle, or sold and delivered into the fuel tank of a motor vehicle fuel-powered highway vehicle, and shall determine immediately the tax on the amount and shall give the highway vehicle operator/fueler notice of this
 determination as prescribed by Section 7671. The determination shall include interest at the modified adjusted rate per month, or fraction thereof, established pursuant to Section 6591.5, from the last day of the month following the date the backup tax applies until the date of remittance to the state. The provisions of Sections 7699 and 7700 shall be applicable with respect to the finality of the determination and the right of the highway vehicle operator/fueler to petition for a redetermination.

(b) A penalty of 25 percent of the amount of tax or five hundred dollars ($500), whichever is greater, shall be added to the tax.

(c) If both the penalty specified in this section and in Section 7405 are otherwise applicable, only the penalty totaling the greatest amount shall be imposed, and, the penalty specified in this section shall be imposed only if the amount of penalty exceeds
 any other applicable penalty.

(d) Where the board determines that the sale, delivery into the fuel tank of a motor vehicle fuel-powered highway vehicle, or sale and delivery into the fuel tank of a motor vehicle fuel-powered highway vehicle of untaxed motor vehicle fuel was due to reasonable cause and circumstances beyond the person’s control, and occurred notwithstanding the exercise of ordinary care and the absence of willful neglect, the person may be relieved of the penalty. A person seeking to be relieved of the penalty shall file with the board a statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts upon which the request for relief is based.

(e) All administrative provisions contained in this part that apply to a supplier shall also be applicable to a highway vehicle operator/fueler.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 429, Sec. 34.   Effective October 2, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 78 of Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

7728.

The board shall file a copy of this jeopardy determination with the Controller who shall forthwith collect the tax, penalty, and interest due from the unlicensed supplier by seizure and sale of property in the manner prescribed for the collection of a delinquent monthly tax.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7729.

At the request of the Controller, the Attorney General shall commence and prosecute to final determination an action at law to collect the tax, penalty, and interest, or any part thereof, determined against an unlicensed supplier.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7730.

In the suit, a copy of the jeopardy determination certified by the secretary of the board or by the Controller, shall be prima facie evidence that the unlicensed supplier is indebted to the state in the amount of the tax, penalties, and interest computed as prescribed by Section 7706.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7731.

The foregoing remedies of the state are cumulative.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7732.

No action taken pursuant to this article relieves the unlicensed supplier or a highway vehicle operator/fueler in any manner from the penal provisions of this part.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Collection of Tax [7851. - 7983.]



  ARTICLE 1. Security for Tax [7851. - 7855.]

7851.

If any supplier is delinquent in the payment of his or her tax, or in the event a determination has been made against him or her which remains unpaid, the Controller may, not later than 10 years after the payment became delinquent, or within 10 years after the last recording or filing of a notice of state tax lien under Section 7171 of the Government Code, give notice thereof personally or by first-class mail to all persons, including any officer or department of the state or any political subdivision or agency of the state, having
 in their possession or under their control any credits or other personal property belonging to the supplier, or owing any debts to the supplier. In the case of any state officer, department or agency, the notice shall be given to such officer, department or agency prior to the time it presents the claim of the delinquent taxpayer to the Controller.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7852.

After receiving the notice the persons so notified shall neither transfer nor make other disposition of the credits, other personal property, or debts in their possession or under their control at the time they receive the notice until the Controller consents to a transfer or disposition or until 60 days elapse after the receipt of the notice, whichever period expires the earlier.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 780.)
-------------------------------------------

7853.

All persons so notified shall forthwith after receipt of the notice advise the Controller of all credits, other personal property, or debts in their possession, under their control, or owing by them. If such notice seeks to prevent the transfer or other disposition of a deposit in a bank or other credits or personal property in the possession or under the control of a bank, the notice to be effective shall state the amount, interest and penalty due from the person and shall be delivered or mailed to the branch or office of such bank at which such deposit is carried or at which such credits or personal property is held. Notwithstanding any other provision, with respect to
 a deposit in a bank or other credits or personal property in the possession or under the control of a bank, the notice shall only be effective with respect to an amount not in excess of two times the amount, interest and penalty due from the person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 103.)
-------------------------------------------

7854.

If, during the effective period of the notice to withhold, any person so notified makes any transfer or disposition of the property or debts required to be withheld, to the extent of the value of the property or the amount of the debts thus transferred or paid, he shall be liable to the State for any indebtedness due under this part from the person with respect to whose obligation the notice was given if solely by reason of such transfer or disposition the State is unable to recover the indebtedness of the person with respect to whose obligation the notice was given.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 780.)
-------------------------------------------

7855.

(a) The Controller may, by notice of levy served personally or by first-class mail,
 require all persons having in their possession, or under their control, any payments, credits other than payments, or personal property belonging to a supplier or other person liable for any amount under this part to withhold from these credits or other personal property the amount of any tax, interest, or penalties due from the supplier or other person, or the amount of any liability incurred by them under this part, and to transmit the amount withheld to the Controller at the time it may designate. The notice of levy shall have the same effect as a levy pursuant to a writ of execution except for the continuing effect of the levy, as provided in subdivision (b).

(b) The person served shall continue to withhold pursuant to the notice of levy until the amount specified in the notice, including accrued interest, has been paid in full, until the notice is withdrawn, or until one year from the date the notice is received, whichever occurs
 first.

(c) The amount required to be withheld is the lesser of the following:

(1) The amount due stated on the notice.

(2) The sum of both of the following:

(A) The amount of the payments, credits other than payments, or personal property described above and under the person’s possession or control when the notice of levy is served on the person.

(B) The amount of each payment that becomes due following service of the notice of levy on the person and prior to the expiration of the levy.

(d) For the purposes of this section, the term “payments” does not include earnings as that term is defined in subdivision (a) of Section
 706.011 of the Code of Civil Procedure or funds in a deposit account as defined in paragraph (29) of subdivision (a) of Section 9102 of the Commercial Code. The term “payments” does include any of the following:

(1) Payments due for services of independent contractors, dividends, rents, royalties, residuals, patent rights, or mineral or other natural rights.

(2) Payments or credits due or becoming due periodically as a result of an enforceable obligation to the supplier or other person liable for the tax.

(3) Any other payments or credits due or becoming due the supplier or other person liable as the result of written or oral contracts for services or sales whether denominated as wages, salary, commission, bonus, or otherwise.

(e) In the case of a
 financial institution, to be effective, the notice shall state the amount due from the taxpayer and shall be delivered or mailed to the branch or office of the financial institution where the credits or other property is held, unless another branch or office is designated by the financial institution to receive the notice.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991) by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 14.5.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Suit for Tax [7861. - 7865.]

7861.

The Controller may request the Attorney General to bring suit for the recovery of any unpaid tax, interest, penalties, and costs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7862.

The Attorney General shall bring suit for any amount due and costs on the written request of the Controller and in the name of the people of the State of California in a court of competent jurisdiction in the County of Sacramento.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 508.)
-------------------------------------------

7863.

Payment of an amount to the board for and on account of the tax and the acceptance thereof does not bar an action by the state to recover any additional amount which is actually due.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7864.

In the action a writ of attachment may be issued in the manner provided by Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 485.010) of Title 6.5 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure without the showing required by Section 485.010 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1516.)
-------------------------------------------

7865.
